Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-532 Lessor's rights to residual
interest. In addition to any other recovery permitted by this article or
other law, the lessor may recover from the lessee an amount that will fully
compensate the lessor for any loss of or damage to the lessor's residual
interest in the goods caused by the default of the lessee. [L 1991, c 40, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next